Florida, session 2026, HB873.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 456.63, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
456.63 Continuing education on maternal mental health.-
(1) Continuing education hours required for licensure
renewal for health care practitioners shall include all of the
following:
(a) The best practices in screening for maternal mental
health disorders.
(b) The range of maternal mental health disorders.
(c) The range of evidence-based treatment options,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb873-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 873 2026
including the importance of allowing a mother to be involved in
developing a treatment plan.
(d) When an obstetrician or a primary care physician
should consult with a psychiatrist versus making a referral.
(2) A board, or the department when there is no board,
shall:
(a) Periodically update any curriculum developed pursuant
to subsection (1) to account for new research.
(b) Accept, as credit toward the continuing education
requirements for renewal of a license, the successful completion
of the curriculum under subsection (1) by a health care
practitioner who practices in the specialty of:
1. Pediatrics;
2. Obstetrics and gynecology;
3. Psychiatry; or
4. Clinical psychology.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb873-00